Connecticut, session 2026, SB00457.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Notwithstanding any
provision of chapter 446d of the general statutes, no person shall collect
or charge a refund value on a beverage container not purchased in this
state.
(b) Any person who wilfully collects or charges a refund value on a
beverage container not purchased in this state on the amount of not less
than five thousand but not more than nineteen thousand nine hundred
and ninety-nine beverage containers in one or more separate
transactions during a single calendar year or who directs another person
to do so shall have committed a class B misdemeanor.
(c) Any person who wilfully collects or charges a refund value on a
beverage container not purchased in this state on the amount of not less
than twenty thousand but not more than thirty thousand nine hundred
and ninety-nine beverage containers in one or more separate
transactions during a one-year period or who directs another person to
do so shall have committed a class A misdemeanor.
(d) Any person who wilfully collects or charges a refund value on a

Substitute Senate Bill No. 457
beverage container not purchased in this state on the amount of forty
thousand or more beverage containers in one or more separate
transactions during a one-year period or who directs another person to
do so shall have committed a class D felony.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to any common
or contract carrier or warehouse worker while engaged in lawfully
transporting or storing beverage containers as merchandise, or any
employee of such carrier or warehouse worker who acts within the
scope of such employee's employment.
Sec. 2. Subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of section 22a-245 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes, as amended by section 1 of public
act 26-2, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective from passage):
(2) For the period commencing April 1, 2026, and ending June 30,
2027, the handling fee paid by a distributor for any beverage container
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection to any redemption center
that, on average, annually processes fifty million or more beverage
containers, as confirmed by the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection in consultation with the Department of
Revenue Services, and that does not utilize automated barcode or
universal product code scanning for the redemption of all such beverage
containers shall be reduced by not more than one cent. On and after July
1, 2027, or at such time that a redemption center subject to such
reduction utilizes automated barcode or universal product code
scanning for the redemption of all such beverage containers, whichever
is earlier, any such reduction in the handling fee shall discontinue. [,
provided such redemption center utilizes automated barcode or
universal product code scanning for the redemption of all such beverage
containers.]
Public Act No. 26-148 2 of 3

Substitute Senate Bill No. 457
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-148 3 of 3